Arkansas, session 2025, HB1753.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Findings - Opt-out.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The United States Supreme Court has long held that states do
not have to participate in the enforcement or effectuation of federal acts or
regulatory programs;
(2) The United States Supreme Court has made this ruling four
(4) times in the last thirty-three (33) years, originating as far back as
1842 in the following cases:
(A) Murphy v. NCAA, 584 U.S. 453 (2018);
(B) Nat'l Fed'n of Indep. Bus. v. Sebelius, 567 U.S. 519
(2012);
(C) Printz v. United States, 521 U.S. 898 (1997);
*SSS156*
03/12/2025 8:03:55 AM SSS156

HB1753
(D) New York v. United States, 505 U.S. 144 (1992); and
(E) Prigg v. Pennsylvania, 41 U.S. 539 (1842); and
(3) This state and its political subdivisions have adopted a
policy of refraining from providing any assistance or material aid for
enforcing or implementing the National Voter Registration Act of 1993, 52
U.S.C. § 20501 et seq.
(b) The State of Arkansas opts out of the enforcement and effectuation
of the National Voter Registration Act of 1993, 52 U.S.C. § 20501 et seq.

SECTION 2. Under the authority granted by Arkansas Constitution,
Amendment 51, § 19, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 5(a), concerning
the duties of registration officials, is amended to read as follows:
(a) Voter At the request of the applicant, voter registration agencies
shall distribute mail voter registration applications, provide assistance to
applicants in completing voter registration application forms, unless the
applicant refuses assistance, and accept completed voter registration
application forms for transmittal to the appropriate permanent registrar via
the Secretary of State. Voter registration agencies include the following:
(1) The Office of Driver Services of the Revenue Division of the
Department of Finance and Administration and all State Revenue Offices;
(2) Public assistance agencies, which shall mean those agencies
that provide services under the Food Stamps Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program, Medicaid, Aid to Families with Dependent Children (AFDC), and the
Special Supplemental Food Nutrition Program for Women, Infants and Children
(WIC) programs;
(3) Disabilities agencies, which shall mean agencies that offer
state-funded programs primarily engaged in providing services to persons with
disabilities;
(4) Public libraries; and
(5) The Arkansas National Guard.

SECTION 3. Under the authority granted by Arkansas Constitution,
Amendment 51, § 19, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 5(b)(2) - (4),
concerning the duties of registration officials, are amended to read as
follows:
(2) The At the request of the applicant, the Office of Driver
03/12/2025 8:03:55 AM SSS156

HB1753
Services and State Revenue Offices shall provide voter registration
opportunities to those obtaining or renewing drivers licenses, personal
identification cards, duplicate or corrected licenses or cards, or changing
address or name whether in person or by mail. The Office of Driver Services
and State Revenue Offices shall use a computer process, which combines the
drivers license and voter registration applications, minimizing duplicative
information, and shall have available the federal or state mail voter
registration application form, which may be used upon request or when the
computer process is not available. If a person declines to apply to register
to vote, the Office of Driver Services or State Revenue Office shall retain
the record of declination for two (2) years.
(3) All At the request of the applicant, all public assistance
agencies shall provide a federal or state mail voter registration application
form with each application for assistance, and with each recertification,
renewal or change of address or name relating to such assistance. Public
assistance agencies shall provide voter registration application forms as
part of the intake process, or as a combined computer process when a computer
process is available. Public assistance agencies shall use a process or form
that combines the application for assistance with the voter registration
application when available. Public assistance agencies shall also provide
declination forms as described in 51-6 [section 6] of this amendment, which
shall be retained for two (2) years if an applicant declines to apply to
register to vote have available the federal or state mail voter registration
application form, which may be used upon request.
(4) All At the request of the applicant, all disabilities
agencies shall provide a federal or state mail voter registration application
form with each application for services and with each recertification,
renewal or change of address or name relating to such services. Disabilities
agencies shall provide voter registration application forms as part of the
intake process, or as a combined computer process when a computer process is
available. Disabilities agencies may use a form that combines the application
for services or assistance with the voter registration application when
available have available the federal or state mail voter registration
application form, which may be used upon request. If the disabilities agency
provides services in a person's home, then the agency shall also provide
voter registration services at the person's home. Disabilities agencies shall
03/12/2025 8:03:55 AM SSS156

HB1753
also provide declination forms as described in 51-6 [section 6] of this
amendment, which shall be retained for two (2) years if an applicant declines
to apply to register to vote.

SECTION 4. Under the authority granted by Arkansas Constitution,
Amendment 51, § 19, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 6, is amended to
read as follows:
§ 6. Voter registration application forms.
(a)(1) The mail voter registration application form may only require
identifying information, including signature or mark, and other information,
including data relating to previous registration by the applicant, as is
necessary to assess the applicant's eligibility and to administer voter
registration and other parts of the election process.
(2)(b) Such forms shall include, in identical print, statements
that:
(A)(1) Specify voter eligibility requirements;
(B)(2) Contain an attestation that the applicant meets all
voter eligibility requirements and that the applicant does not claim the
right to vote in another county or state;
(C)(3) Specify the penalties provided by law for
submission of a false voter registration application;
(D)(4) Inform applicants that where they register to vote
will be kept confidential;
(E) Inform applicants that declining to register will also
be kept confidential; and
(F)(5) Inform applicants that they will be required to
verify their registration when voting in person or by absentee ballot by
providing a required document or identification card as provided in Arkansas
Constitution, Amendment 51, § 13.;
(G)(6) Inform the applicant that if the voter registration
application is being collected by a third-party voter registration
organization, the third-party voter registration organization may be unable
to deliver the application to the permanent registrar in the county in which
the applicant resides before the thirty-day voter registration deadline to
vote in the next election and that the applicant may elect to deliver the
application in person or by mail; and
03/12/2025 8:03:55 AM SSS156

HB1753
(H) (7) Inform the applicant of the process to determine
if the application has been received by the Secretary of State.
(3)(c) The following information will be required of the
applicant:
(A) (1) Full name;
(B) (2) Mailing address;
(C) (3) Residence address and any other information
necessary to identify the residence of the applicant;
(D) (4) If previously registered, the name then supplied
by the applicant, and the previous address, county, and state;
(E) (5) Date of birth;
(F) (6) A signature or mark made under penalty of perjury
that the applicant meets each requirement for voter registration;
(G) (7) If the applicant is unable to sign his or her
name, the name, address, and telephone number of the person providing
assistance;
(H)(8) If the applicant has a current and valid driver's
license, the applicant's driver's license number;
(I)(9) If the applicant does not have a current and valid
driver's license, the last four (4) digits of the applicant's social security
number; and
(J)(10) If the applicant does not have a current and valid
driver's license number or social security number, the Secretary of State
will assign the applicant a number which will serve to identify the applicant
for voter registration purposes, and this number shall be placed on the
application.
(4)(d) The following information may be requested on the
registration card, but it shall not be required:
(A)(1) Telephone number where the applicant may be
contacted; and
(B)(2) Political party with which the applicant wishes to
be affiliated, if any.
(5)(e) The mail voter registration application shall not include
any requirement for notarization or other formal authentication.
(6)(f) The mail voter registration application form shall
include the following questions along with boxes for the applicant to check
03/12/2025 8:03:55 AM SSS156

HB1753
“yes” or “no” in response:
(A)(1) “Are you a citizen of the United States of America
and an Arkansas resident?”;
(B)(2) “Will you be eighteen (18) years of age on or
before election day?”;
(C)(3) “Are you presently adjudged mentally incompetent by
a court of competent jurisdiction?”; and
(D)(4) “Have you ever been convicted of a felony without
your sentence having been discharged or pardoned?”.
(7)(g) The mail voter registration application form shall
include the following statements immediately following the questions asked in
subdivision (a)(6) subsection (f) of this section:
(A)(1) “If you checked ‘No’ in response to either
questions A or B, do not complete this form.”;
(B)(2) “If you checked ‘Yes’ in response to either
questions C or D, do not complete this form.”; and
(C)(3) The mail-in voter registration application form
shall include the following statement:
“If your voter registration application form is
submitted by mail and you are registering for the first time, and you do not
have a valid driver's license number or Social Security number, in order to
avoid the additional identification requirements upon voting for the first
time you must submit with the mailed registration form: (a) a current and
valid photo identification; or (b) a copy of a current utility bill, bank
statement, government check, paycheck, or other government document that
shows your name and address.”.
(8)(h) If an applicant for voter registration fails to provide
any of the information required by this section, the permanent registrar
shall notify the applicant of the failure and provide the applicant with an
opportunity to complete the form in a timely manner to allow for its
completion before the next election for federal office.
(9)(i) The mail voter registration application shall be pre-
addressed to the Secretary of State.
(b)(1) The voter registration application portion of the process used
by the Office of Driver Services and state revenue offices shall include:
(A) The question: “If you are not registered to vote where
03/12/2025 8:03:55 AM SSS156

HB1753
you live now, would you like to apply to register to vote here today?”;
(B) A statement that if an applicant declines to register
to vote, the fact that the applicant has declined to register will remain
confidential and will be used only for voter registration purposes;
(C) A statement that if an applicant does register to
vote, the office at which the applicant submits a voter registration
application will remain confidential and will be used only for voter
registration purposes;
(D) Voter registration eligibility requirements;
(E) Penalties provided by law for providing false
information;
(F) An attestation that the applicant meets each
eligibility requirement and that the applicant does not claim the right to
vote in another county or state; and
(G) A space for the applicant's signature or mark.
(2) The voter registration application portion shall require the
signature of the applicant under penalty of perjury, but shall not require
notarization or other formal authentication.
(c) Public assistance agencies and disabilities agencies shall
provide, in addition to the federal or state mail voter registration
application form, a declination form, to be approved by the State Board of
Election Commissioners, which includes the following question and statements:
(1) The question in prominent type, “IF YOU ARE NOT REGISTERED
TO VOTE WHERE YOU LIVE NOW, WOULD YOU LIKE TO APPLY TO REGISTER TO VOTE HERE
TODAY? YES ............. NO .............”;
(2) The statement in close proximity to the question above and
in equally prominent type, “IF YOU DO NOT CHECK EITHER BOX, YOU WILL BE
CONSIDERED TO HAVE DECIDED NOT TO REGISTER TO VOTE AT THIS TIME.”;
(3) The statement, “APPLYING TO REGISTER OR DECLINING TO
REGISTER TO VOTE WILL NOT AFFECT THE AMOUNT OF ASSISTANCE THAT YOU WILL BE
PROVIDED BY THIS AGENCY.”;
(4) The statement, “IF YOU WOULD LIKE HELP IN FILLING OUT THE
VOTER REGISTRATION APPLICATION FORM, WE WILL HELP YOU. THE DECISION WHETHER
TO SEEK OR ACCEPT HELP IS YOURS. YOU MAY FILL OUT THE APPLICATION FORM IN
PRIVATE.”;
(5) The statement, “IF YOU BELIEVE THAT SOMEONE HAS INTERFERED
03/12/2025 8:03:55 AM SSS156

HB1753
WITH YOUR RIGHT TO REGISTER OR TO DECLINE TO REGISTER TO VOTE, YOUR RIGHT TO
PRIVACY IN DECIDING WHETHER TO REGISTER OR IN APPLYING TO REGISTER TO VOTE,
OR YOUR RIGHT TO CHOOSE YOUR OWN POLITICAL PARTY OR OTHER POLITICAL
PREFERENCE, YOU MAY FILE A COMPLAINT WITH THE SECRETARY OF STATE AT
.............” (filled in with the address and telephone number of the
Secretary of State's office);
(6) The statement, “IF YOU DECLINE TO REGISTER TO VOTE, THE FACT
THAT YOU HAVE DECLINED TO REGISTER WILL REMAIN CONFIDENTIAL AND WILL BE USED
ONLY FOR VOTER REGISTRATION PURPOSES.”; and
(7) The statement, “IF YOU DO REGISTER TO VOTE, THE OFFICE AT
WHICH YOU SUBMIT A VOTER REGISTRATION APPLICATION WILL REMAIN CONFIDENTIAL
AND WILL BE USED ONLY FOR VOTER REGISTRATION PURPOSES.”.

SECTION 5. Under the authority granted by Arkansas Constitution,
Amendment 51, § 19, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 8(b), concerning
transfer and change in status of a registered voter, is amended to read as
follows:
(b) The Office of Driver Services, State Revenue Offices, public
assistance agencies, disabilities and other voter registration agencies shall
collect data on the number of voter registration applications completed or
declined at each agency, and any additional statistical evidence that the
Secretary of State or the State Board of Election Commissioners deems
necessary for program evaluation and shall retain such voter registration
data for a period of two (2) years.

SECTION 6. Under the authority granted by Arkansas Constitution,
Amendment 51, § 19, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 8(c)(1),
concerning transfer and change in status of a registered voter, is amended to
read as follows:
(c)(1) The Secretary of State shall collect, maintain, and publish
monthly statistical data reflecting the number of new voter registration
applications, and changes of address, name, and party affiliation, and
declinations received by mail and in:
(A) state State revenue offices;
(B) public Public assistance agencies;
(C) disabilities Disabilities agencies;
03/12/2025 8:03:55 AM SSS156

HB1753
(D) recruitment Recruitment offices of the Armed Forces of
the United States;
(E) public Public libraries; and
(F) offices Offices of the Arkansas National Guard.

SECTION 7. Under the authority granted by Arkansas Constitution,
Amendment 51, § 19, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 10(a) and (b)
concerning transfer and change in status of a registered voter, is amended to
read as follows:
(a) Upon a change of legal residence within the county, or a change of
name, any registered voter may cause his or her registration to be
transferred to his or her new address or new name by completing and mailing a
federal or state mail voter registration application form, by updating his or
her address at the Office of Driver Services, any state revenue office,
public assistance agency, disabilities agency, or other voter registration
agency, by signing a mailed request to the permanent registrar, giving his or
her present address and the address at which he or she was last registered or
his or her present name and the name under which he or she was last
registered, or by applying in person at the office of the permanent
registrar.
(b)(1) Upon a change of legal residence from one (1) county within the
state to another county within the state, any registered voter may cause his
or her registration to be transferred to the new county at his or her new
address by:
(A) Completing and mailing a federal or state mail voter
registration application form;
(B) Updating his or her new address at a voter
registration agency, including without limitation the Office of Driver
Services or a state revenue office, public assistance agency, or disabilities
agency;
(C) Signing a mailed request to the permanent registrar
giving the voter's present address and the address at which the voter was
last registered; or
(D)(C) Applying in person for the transfer at the office
of the permanent registrar.
(2)(A) If the updated registration information is actually
03/12/2025 8:03:55 AM SSS156

HB1753
received in the office of the county clerk of the voter's new county not
later than four (4) days before a scheduled election, the voter shall have
the right to vote in the scheduled election in the precinct into which the
voter just moved in the new county.
(B) If the updated registration information is not
actually received by the fourth day before a scheduled election, the voter
shall not be eligible to vote in the scheduled election.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 7-1-101(15), concerning general definitions
regarding elections, is amended to read as follows:
(15) “Fail-safe voting” means the mechanism established under
the National Voter Registration Act of 1993, 52 U.S.C. § 20501 et seq., that
allows a voter who has moved within the same county to vote at his or her new
precinct without having updated his or her voter registration records;

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 7-7-307(b), concerning additional voter
qualifications for primary elections, is repealed.
(b) However, any additional qualifications established by a political
party shall comply with the National Voter Registration Act of 1993.

















03/12/2025 8:03:55 AM SSS156